finished/ood.foma
source oldcanonicalize.foma

### ALPHABET & PARTS ###

#define alphabet & parts
def Alphabet [% |%ʼ|%-|%:|%:|%`|A|O|C|J|M|O|S|T|a|ă|b|c|d|d̥|e|ĕ|g|h|i|ĭ|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|s|s̥|t|u|w|y|ñ|ŋ|z|̆|̥];
#from getchar.py:[ |'|-|:|A|C|J|M|O|S|T|`|a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|s|t|u|w|y|ñ|ŋ|ʼ|̆|̥]

#apostrophes causing trouble - two kinds?
#woʼo[V][IPFV][SG][FUT] woʼod SHOULD BE: wo'od

def Vowel [A|O|a|ă|e|ĕ|i|ĭ|o|u];
def Cons  [%ʼ|%ʼ|C|J|M|O|S|T|b|c|d|d̥|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|s|s̥|t|w|y|ñ|ŋ|z|̆|̥];



### LEXICON ###



#open defined lexicon
read lexc ood.lexc
eliminate flags
def Lex;



### GUESSER ###



def Stem [Alphabet]+ ;

def Guesser [
       Stem          ["[N]" "[SG]"]:0 |
       Stem          ["[N]" "[PL]"]:0 |
       Stem          ["[V]" "[IMP]" "[SG]" "[PRS]"]:{iñ} |
       Stem          ["[V]" "[IMP]" "[PL]" "[PRS]"]:{iñ} |
       Stem          ["[V]" "[PRF]" "[SG]" "[PRS]"]:0 |
       Stem          ["[V]" "[PRF]" "[PL]" "[PRS]"]:0 |
       Stem          ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[PRS]"]:0 |
       Stem          ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[FUT]"]:{ad} |
       Stem          ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[PL]" "[PRS]"]:0 |
       Stem          ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[PL]" "[FUT]"]:{ad} ];



### REDUPLICATION ###



#reduplication of first onset + nucleus for words with tag [REDUP]
#mark onset + nucleus with brackets
def MarkRedup [Cons Vowel] @-> %[ ... %] || "[REDUP]" _;
#replace tag with misc characters
def InsertRedup "[REDUP]" -> %[ [Cons Vowel] %];
#remove brackets
def RemoveMarks [ %[ | %] ] -> 0;

#Certain characters drop at the end of the redup sequence 
#CVCV>CVC or CVCV:>CVCV
def RedupDrop1 %: -> 0 || %]_ ;
def DropContext [o|k|t|p|s|d|h|y|c];  
	###l/n/g/w/s̥ are addressed under Class Mods below
def RedupDrop2 Vowel -> 0 || _ %] DropContext;
def WtoP w -> p || %] %[ _;

def RedupDrop RedupDrop1 .o. RedupDrop2 .o. WtoP;

def LexGrammar _eq(Lex .o. MarkRedup .o. InsertRedup, %[, %]) .o. RedupDrop .o. RemoveMarks;

def Grammar LexGrammar .P. Guesser;



### CLASS MODIFICATIONS ###



#replace lexc placeholders
def DropX1 [[i g ĭ]|{igid}|{id}|{an}|{pd̥a}][%^X] @-> 0  || _ .#.;
def DropX2 [d|d̥|g|n|k|s̥|m|e|a][X] @-> 0 || _ .#.;
def DropV Vowel -> 0 || .#. Cons Vowel Cons _ (Alphabet)+ [%^V] ;
def DropVCln [%^V] -> 0;
     #doesn't accomodate s-/S-

def ClassMods DropX1 .o. DropX2 .o. DropV .o. DropVCln;



### VOWEL CHANGES ###



def DoubleVowel1 {ad} -> {d} || Vowel _ ;
def DoubleVowel2 {iñ} -> {ñ} || Vowel _ ;
def DiaShift1 ĭ -> i || _ [ñ|d];
def DiaShift2 ă -> a || _ [ñ|d];
def DiaShift3 ĕ -> e || _ [ñ|d];
def DiaShift4 [%'|%`] -> %: || _ .#.;

def VowChg  DoubleVowel1 .o. DoubleVowel2 .o. DiaShift1 .o. DiaShift2 .o. DiaShift3 .o. DiaShift4;


#def Diacritics i -> ĭ || _ .#.;  #this alone takes it down 3%



### CLEANUP & COMPILATION ###



#remove extra capitals from redup step
def CFix C -> c || C (Cons|Vowel)+ _;
def MFix M -> m || M (Cons|Vowel)+ _;

def Cleanup CFix .o. MFix;

regex Canonicalize(Grammar) .o. ClassMods .o. VowChg .o. Cleanup; 
save stack ood.fomabin
